src/fst/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc
LEXICON x_e_pl
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** the pl
 +Pl+Nom:h%>ee t_PxK ; !
 +Pl+Gen:h%>eitte n_PxK ; !
 +Pl+Gen:h%>eje n_PxK ; !
 +Pl+Par:h%>ej^A   PxK ; !
 +Pl+Par:h%>eit^A   PxK ; !
 +Pl+Ill:h%>ei2shii n_PxK ; !
 +Pl+Ill:^HMET2%>hei2shii n_PxK ; 
 +Pl+Ine:h%>ei2ss^A   PxK ; ! liikheissä !
 +Pl+Ine:^HMET2%>hei2ss^A   PxK ;
 +Pl+Ela:h%>ei2st^A   PxK ; ! liikheessä, säkheessä !
 +Pl+Ela:^HMET2%>hei2st^A   PxK ; 
 +Pl+All:h%>ei2le    PxxK ; ! liikheelä, säkheelä!
 +Pl+All:^HMET2%>hei2le    PxxK ;
 +Pl+Ade:h%>ei2l^A    PxK ; ! liikheelä, säkheelä!
 +Pl+Ade:^HMET2%>hei2l^A    PxK ; 
 +Pl+Abl:h%>ei2lt^A    PxK ; ! liikheelä, säkheelä!
 +Pl+Abl:^HMET2%>hei2lt^A    PxK ;
 +Pl+Tra:h%>ei2 TRA ; !
 +Pl+Tra:^HMET2%>hei2 TRA ;
 +Pl+Ess:h%>ei2n^A PxK ; !
 +Pl+Ess:^HMET2%>hei2n^A PxK ;
 +Pl+Abe:h%>ei2tt^A PxK ; !
 +Pl+Abe:^HMET2%>hei2tt^A PxK ;


!LEXICON n_e_odd
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@**  urvakke etc, n_e-ord med -lle/-lla 
 !+N: x_e_odd ;
 !+N+Nom: R ;
 !+N+Gen:he%>en R ;

!LEXICON x_e_odd
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** splits in sg and pl
 !x_e_odd_sg ;
 !x_e_odd_pl ;

!LEXICON x_e_odd_sg ! urvakke etc, n_e-ord med -lle/-lla 
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** the sg
 !+Sg+Nom:^WG      KK ; ! eläke
 !+Sg+Nom+Err/Orth:^WGt      KK ; ! 
 !+Sg+Gen:^WGh%>een    PxK ; ! 
 !+Sg+Gen:^HMET2%>heen    PxK ; ! 
 !+Sg+Par:^WG%>tt^A PxK ; ! 
 !+Sg+Ill:^WGh%>eeshee     n_PxK ; ! 
 !+Sg+Ill:^HMET2%>heeshee     n_PxK ; ! 
 !+Sg+Ine:^WGh%>eess^A   PxK ; ! 
 !+Sg+Ine:^HMET2%>heess^A   PxK ; ! 
 !+Sg+Ela:^WGh%>eest^A   PxK ; ! 
 !+Sg+Ela:^HMET2%>heest^A   PxK ; ! 
 !+Sg+All:^WGh%>eele    PxxK ; ! 
 !+Sg+All:^HMET2%>heele    PxxK ; ! 
 !+Sg+Ade:^WGh%>eel^A    PxK ; ! 
 !+Sg+Ade:^HMET2%>heel^A    PxK ; ! 
 !+Sg+Abl:^WGh%>eelt^A   PxK ; ! 
 !+Sg+Abl:^HMET2%>heelt^A   PxK ; ! 
 !+Sg+Tra:^WGh%>ee TRA ;
 !+Sg+Tra:^HMET2%>hee TRA ; ! 
 !+Sg+Ess:^WGh%>een^A PxK ;
 !+Sg+Ess:^HMET2%>heen^A PxK ; ! 
 !+Sg+Abe:%>ett^A PxK ;

!LEXICON x_e_odd_pl
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** the pl
 !+Pl+Nom:^WGh%>eet     K ;
 !+Pl+Nom:^WGh%>ee      Px ;
 !+Pl+Gen:^WGh%>eitten   PxK ;
 !+Pl+Gen:^WGh%>ejen   PxK ;
 !+Pl+Par:^WGh%>ej^A   PxK ;
 !+Pl+Ill:%>e     n_PxK ; ! liikheen, säkheen
 !+Pl+Ine:%>ess^A   PxK ; ! liikheessä, säkheessä
 !+Pl+Ela:%>est^A   PxK ; ! liikheessä, säkheessä
 !+Pl+Ade:%>ei2le    PxxK ; ! liikheelä, säkheelä
 !+Pl+All:%>ei2l^A    PxK ; ! liikheelä, säkheelä
 !+Pl+Abl:%>ei2lt^A    PxK ; ! liikheelä, säkheelä
 !+Pl+Tra:%>ei2 TRA ;
 !+Pl+Ess:%>ei2n^A PxK ;
 !+Pl+Abe:%>ei2tt^A PxK ;

LEXICON n_vehke
n_e ;
+N+Sg+Gen:%>e n_PxK ; 
+N+Sg+Ill:%>eshee n_PxK ; !vehkeesheen
+N+Sg+Ill:%>esee n_PxK ; !vehkeeseen
+N+Sg+Ill:h%>esee n_PxK ; !vehkheeseen
+N+Sg+Ine:%>ess^A   PxK ; ! liikheessä, säkheessä, ainheessa !TEST stryka WG före h?
+N+Sg+Ela:%>est^A   PxK ; ! liikheestä, säkheestä !TEST stryka WG före h?
+N+Sg+All:%>ele    PxxK ; ! liikheele, liihkeelekki !TEST stryka WG före h?
+N+Sg+Ade:%>el^A    PxK ; ! liikheelä, säkheelä !TEST stryka WG före h?
+N+Sg+Abl:%>elt^A   PxK ; ! liikheeltä, säkheeltä !TEST stryka WG före h?
+N+Sg+Tra:%>e TRA ; 
+N+Sg+Ess:%>en^A PxK ; !TEST stryka WG före h?
+N+Sg+Abe:%>ett^A PxK ;

+N+Pl+Nom:%>e t_PxK ; !
+N+Pl+Gen:%>itte n_PxK ; !
+N+Pl+Par:h%>ej^A   PxK ; !
+N+Pl+Par:e%>it^A   PxK ; !
+N+Pl+Ill:e%>i2shii n_PxK ; !
+N+Pl+Ill:h%>ei2ssii n_PxK ; !
+N+Pl+Ill:e%>i2ssii n_PxK ; !
+N+Pl+Ine:e%>i2ss^A   PxK ; ! 
+N+Pl+Ela:e%>i2st^A   PxK ; ! 
+N+Pl+All:e%>i2le    PxxK ; ! 
+N+Pl+Ade:e%>i2l^A    PxK ; ! 
+N+Pl+Abl:e%>i2lt^A    PxK ; ! 
+N+Pl+Tra:e%>i2 TRA ; !
+N+Pl+Ess:e%>i2n^A PxK ; !
+N+Pl+Abe:e%>i2tt^A PxK ; !

LEXICON n_et
!!n_e ;
+N+Sg+Nom:%> t_PxK ; 
+N+Sg+Gen:h%>ee n_PxK ; ! liikheen, säkheen, ainheen !TEST stryka WG före h?
+N+Sg+Gen:^HMET2%>hee n_PxK ; ! aihneen, liihkeen
+N+Sg+Par:^WG%>tt^A PxK ; ! liikettä, säettä 
+N+Sg+Ill:h%>eeshee n_PxK ; ! liikheesheen !TEST stryka WG före h?
+N+Sg+Ill:^HMET2%>heeshee n_PxK ; ! aihneesheen
+N+Sg+Ine:h%>eess^A   PxK ; ! liikheessä, säkheessä, ainheessa !TEST stryka WG före h?
+N+Sg+Ine:^HMET2%>heess^A   PxK ; ! NY aihneessa 
+N+Sg+Ela:h%>eest^A   PxK ; ! liikheestä, säkheestä !TEST stryka WG före h?
+N+Sg+Ela:^HMET2%>heest^A   PxK ; ! NY aihneesta
+N+Sg+All:h%>eele    PxxK ; ! liikheele, liihkeelekki !TEST stryka WG före h?
+N+Sg+All:^HMET2%>heele    PxxK ; ! NY
+N+Sg+Ade:h%>eel^A    PxK ; ! liikheelä, säkheelä !TEST stryka WG före h?
+N+Sg+Ade:^HMET2%>heel^A    PxK ; ! NY
+N+Sg+Abl:h%>eelt^A   PxK ; ! liikheeltä, säkheeltä !TEST stryka WG före h?
+N+Sg+Abl:^HMET2%>heelt^A   PxK ; ! NY
+N+Sg+Tra:h%>ee TRA ; !TEST stryka WG före h?
+N+Sg+Tra:^HMET2%>hee TRA ; ! NY
+N+Sg+Ess:h%>een^A PxK ; !TEST stryka WG före h?
+N+Sg+Ess:^HMET2%>heen^A PxK ; ! NY
+N+Sg+Abe:%>ett^A PxK ;

+N: x_e_pl ;

LEXICON n_kevät
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
+N+Sg+Nom:%> t_PxK ; !v
+N+Sg+Gen:^HMETAh%>ää n_PxK ; ! !v
!!+N+Sg+Gen:^HMET2%>h^A^A n_PxK ; 
+N+Sg+Par:%>tt^A PxK ; 
+N+Sg+Ill:^HMETAh%>ääshee n_PxK ; !v
+N+Sg+Ine:^HMETAh%>ääss^A   PxK ; !v
+N+Sg+Ela:^HMETAh%>ääst^A   PxK ; !v
+N+Sg+All:^HMETAh%>ääle    PxxK ; !v
+N+Sg+Ade:^HMETAh%>ääl^A    PxK ; !v
+N+Sg+Abl:^HMETAh%>äält^A   PxK ; !v
+N+Sg+Tra:^HMETAh%>ää TRA ; !v
+N+Sg+Ess:^HMETAh%>ään^A PxK ; !v
+N+Sg+Abe:^HMETAh%>ätt^A PxK ;

+N+Pl+Nom:^HMETAh%>ää t_PxK ;
+N+Pl+Gen:^HMETAh%>äi2tte n_PxK ;
+N+Pl+Par:^HMETAh%>äi2t^A PxK ; !kevhäitä
+N+Pl+Ill:^HMETAh%>äi2%>shii n_PxK ;
+N+Pl+Ine:^HMETAh%>äi2ss^A PxK  ;
+N+Pl+Ela:^HMETAh%>äi2st^A PxK ;
+N+Pl+All:^HMETAh%>äi2le PxK ;
+N+Pl+Ade:^HMETAh%>äi2l^A PxK ;
+N+Pl+Abl:^HMETAh%>äi2lt^A PxK ;
+N+Pl+Tra:^HMETA%>häi2 TRA ;
+N+Pl+Ess:^HMETAh%>äi2n^A PxK ;
+N+Pl+Abe:^HMETAh%>äi2tt^A PxK  ;


LEXICON n3 
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@**  odd-syllabic: kanava
 +N: x3 ;
 +N+Nom:^E2I R ;
 +N+Gen:^WG%>n R ;

LEXICON n3_pl
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@**  haalarit
 +N: x3_pl ;

LEXICON x3
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@**
 x3_sg ;
 x3_pl ;

LEXICON x3_oblique
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@**
x3_oblique_sg ;
x3_pl ;

LEXICON x3_sg
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@**
 +Sg+Nom:^E2I       PxK ;
 x3_oblique_sg ;

LEXICON x3_oblique_sg
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@**
 +Sg+Gen:^WG%> n_PxK ;
 +Sg+Par:%>^A PxK ;
 +Sg+Ill:^HMETA%>h^V^V n_PxK ;
 +Sg+Ill:^HMET2%>h^V^V n_PxK ;
 +Sg+Ine:^WG%>ss^A PxK ;
 +Sg+Ela:^WG%>st^A PxK ;
 +Sg+All:^WG%>lle PxxK ;
 +Sg+Ade:^WG%>ll^A PxK ;
 +Sg+Abl:^WG%>lt^A PxK ;
 +Sg+Ess:%>nn^A PxK ;
 +Sg+Tra:^WG TRA ;
 +Sg+Abe:^WG%>tt^A PxK ;

LEXICON x3_pl
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@**
 +Pl+Nom:^WG%> t_PxK ;
 +Pl+Gen:^A2O%>i2tte n_PxK ; !TBC: päärynöitten
 +Pl+Gen:%>i2tte n_PxK ;
 +Pl+Gen+Err/Orth:%>i2e n_PxK ;
 !+Pl+Par:i%>i2t^A PxK ; !asioita
 +Pl+Par:%>i2t^A PxK ; !asioita
 +Pl+Par:^A2O%>i2t^A PxK ; !TBC: päärynöitä
 +Pl+Ill:^HMETA%>h^Vi2 n_PxK ;
 +Pl+Ill:^HMET2%>h^Vi2 n_PxK ;
 +Pl+Ine:^WG%>i2ss^A PxK ;
 +Pl+Ela:^WG%>i2st^A PxK ;
 +Pl+All:^WG%>i2lle PxK ;
 +Pl+Ade:^WG%>i2ll^A PxK ;
 +Pl+Abl:^WG%>i2lt^A PxK ;
 +Pl+Tra:%>i2 TRA ;
 +Pl+Ess:%>i2n^A PxK ;
 +Pl+Abe:%>i2tt^A PxK ;

 LEXICON n3_ta
 !! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@**
 +N+Nom: R ;
 +N+Gen:^WG%>n R ;
 +N+Sg+Nom:^E2I       PxK ;
 +N+Sg+Gen:^WG%> n_PxK ;
 +N+Sg+Par:%>t^A PxK ;
 +N+Sg+Ill:^HMETA%>h^V^V n_PxK ;
 +N+Sg+Ill:^HMET2%>h^V^V n_PxK ;
 +N+Sg+Ine:^WG%>ss^A PxK ;
 +N+Sg+Ela:^WG%>st^A PxK ;
 +N+Sg+All:^WG%>lle PxxK ;
 +N+Sg+Ade:^WG%>ll^A PxK ;
 +N+Sg+Abl:^WG%>lt^A PxK ;
 +N+Sg+Ess:%>nn^A PxK ;
 +N+Sg+Tra:^WG TRA ;
 +N+Sg+Abe:^WG%>tt^A PxK ;

 +N: x3_pl ;

 LEXICON n3_lma
 !! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@**
 +N:a x3_sg ;
 +N+Pl+Nom:a^WG%> t_PxK ;
 +N+Pl+Gen:%>i2tte n_PxK ;
 +N+Pl+Gen+Err/Orth:%>i2e n_PxK ;
 +N+Pl+Par:%>i2^A PxK ; 
 +N+Pl+Ill:i^HMETA%>h^Vi2 n_PxK ;
 +N+Pl+Ill:i^HMET2%>h^Vi2 n_PxK ;
 +N+Pl+Ine:^WG%>i2ss^A PxK ;
 +N+Pl+Ela:^WG%>i2st^A PxK ;
 +N+Pl+All:^WG%>i2lle PxK ;
 +N+Pl+Ade:^WG%>i2ll^A PxK ;
 +N+Pl+Abl:^WG%>i2lt^A PxK ;
 +N+Pl+Tra:%>i2 TRA ;
 +N+Pl+Ess:%>i2n^A PxK ;
 +N+Pl+Abe:%>i2tt^A PxK ;

 LEXICON n3_asia
 !! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@**
 n3 ;
 +N+Sg+Par:%>t^A PxK ; !asiata

LEXICON 3nc ! jiddisch
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@**
+N: xnc ;
