src/fst/morphology/stems/nouns.lexc
LEXICON NounRoot !!≈ * **@CODE@**
karkea:karkea n3 ;
kunnia:kunnia n3_asia ;
vääräkunnia:väärä#kunnia n3_asia ;
kaappia:kaappia n3 ;
asia:asia n3_asia ;
lakiasia:laki#asia n3_asia ;
tosiasia:tosi#asia n3_asia ;
pääasia:pää#asia n3_asia ;
naima-asia:naima-asia n3_asia ;
kauppa-asia:kauppa-asia n3_asia ;
ohrahaasia:ohra#haasia n3_asia ;
jalkahaasia:jalka#haasia n3_asia ;
valkeasia:valkeasia n3_asia ;
tupakkarasia:tupakka#rasia n3_asia ;
kihlarasia:kihla#rasia n3_asia ;
tykkirasia:tykki#rasia n3_asia ;
voirasia:voi#rasia n3_asia ;
juustorasia:juusto#rasia n3_asia ;
tiskiastia:tiski#astia n3 ;
jaarankolkkaaja:jaarankolkkaaja n3 ;
kirkontervaaja:kirkontervaaja n3 ;
ortaraja:ortaraja n3 ;
valtaostaja:valtaostaja n3 ;
tervansoutaja:tervansoutaja n3 ;
yksinolija:yksin#olija n3 ;
leposija:leposija n3 ;
kirjakka:kirjakka n3 ;
praktiikka:praktiikka n3 ;
karikka:karikka n3 ;
veitikka:veitikka n3 ;
kelmukka:kelmukka n3 ;
kalsukat:kalsukka n3_pl ;
nassukka:nassukka n3 ;
jumala:jumal n3_lma ;
kostjumala:kost#jumal n3_lma ;
piimäjumala:piimä#jumal n3_lma ;
epäjumala:epä#jumal n3_lma ;
ohjelma:ohjelm n3_lma ;
unelma:unelm n3_lma ;
taikina:taikina n3 ;
kevätmarkkinat:kevät#markkina n3_pl ;
mammona:mammon n3_lma ;
navetanikkuna:navetan#ikkuna n3 ;
vehe:vehke n_vehke ;
jiddisch:jiddisch 3nc ;
pii:pii n3 ;
kestingit:kestinki n3_pl ;
viinalangari:viinalangari n3 ;
kelilakkari:kelilakkari n3 ;
haalarit:haalari n3_pl ;
pelari:pelari n3 ;
tuomari:tuomari n3 ;
naasari:naasari n3 ;
patsarit:patsari n3_pl ;
jäägmestari:jääg#mestari n3 ;
pauarit:pauari n3_pl ;
varvari:varvari n3 ;
kekkerit:kekkeri n3_pl ;
kahvikekkerit:kahvi#kekkeri n3_pl ;
kinkerit:kinkeri n3_pl ;
lukukinkerit:luku#kinkeri n3_pl ;
rötterit:rötteri n3_pl ;
kalaasit:kalaasi n3_pl ;
potusit:potusi n3_pl ;
pislapotuusit:pisla#potuusi n3_pl ;
liika-ahkio:liika-ahkio n3_ta ;
lukkuahkio:lukkuahkio n3_ta ;
tunkio:tunkio n3_ta ;
tuokio:tuokio n3_ta ;
lepokammio:lepokammio n3_ta ;
tuomio:tuomio n3_ta ;
viettikanio:vietti#kanio n3_ta ;
peltovainio:pelto#vainio n3_ta ;
luomaraunio:luoma#raunio n3_ta ;
sontalapio:sontalapio n3_ta ;
leipilapio:leipilapio n3_ta;
kalpio:kalpio n3_ta ;
uopio:uopio n3_ta ;
unenhourio:unenhourio n3_ta ;
komsio:komsio n3_ta ;
raatio:raatio n3_ta ;
raitio:raitio n3_ta ;
pantio:pantio n3_ta ;
hartio:hartio n3_ta ;
autio:autio n3_ta ;
tuhkarautio:tuhkarautio n3_ta ;
kuutio:kuutio n3_ta ;
pullokavio:pullokavio n3_ta ;
kivikko:kivikko n3 ;
uhkuavento:uhkuavento n3 ;
ulkosaaristo:ulkosaaristo n3 ;
ylimaat:ylimaa n_et ;
kasvattivanheemat:kasvatti#vanheema n_et ;
vanhimat:vanhima n_et ;
paskamakkarat:paska#makkara n_et ;
maet:mae n_et ;
johdet:johde n_et ;
nöylet:nöyle n_et ;
ruumenet:ruumene n_et ;
jännet:jänne n_et ;
meltet:melte n_et ;
kostet:koste n_et ;
kesätet:kesäte n_et ;
lapsivuet:lapsivue n_et ;
tervet:terve n_et ;
vainiot:vainio n_et ;
kevät:kevä n_kevät ;
matkaeväät:matkaevää n_et ;
käräjät:käräjä n3_pl ;
maakäräjät:maa#käräjä n3_pl ;
käärmheenkäräjät:käärmheen#käräjä n3_pl ;
äpärät:äpärä n3_pl ;
jiekiö:jiekiö n3_ta ;
röykkiö:röykkiö n3_ta ;
yhtiö:yhtiö n3_ta ;
ryykkö:ryy#kkö n3 ;
paskaryykkö:paskaryykkö n3 ;
suitheet:suithee n_et ;
saevaatheet:saevaathee n_et ;
sankarihautajaiset:sankarihautajaise n_et ;
sortsit:sortsi n_et ;
herskapit:herskapi n_et ;
häiriö:häiriö n3_ta ;
hukanrauat:hukanraua n_et ;
majuriteettivaalit:majuriteettivaali n_et ;
maa-asia:maa-asia n3_asia ;
maaomistusasia:maaomistusasia n3_asia ;
flingat:flinga n_et ;
ongelma:ongelm n3_lma ;
opetuskeittiö:opetus#keittiö n3_ta ;
Antinmarkkinat:Antinmarkkina n_et ;
apokryyfit:apokryyfi n_et ;
anttiviirysohjelma:anttiviirys#ohjelm n3_lma ;
alkkohooliongelma:alkkohooli#ongelm n3_lma ;
kokkointumissanat:kokkointumissana n_et ;
kunnalisvaalit:kunnalisvaali n_et ;
neulomakonet:neulomakone n_et ;
nuuskurasia:nuuskurasia n3_asia ;
neulumakonet:neulumakone n_et ;
ääliö:ääliö n3_ta ;
pikkuasia:pikkuasia n3_asia ;
pikkukonet:pikkukonet n_et ;
lekenta:lekenta n3 ;
lämpöongelma:lämpö#ongelm n3_lma ;
riita-asia:riita-asia n3_asia ;
virka-asia:virka-asia n3_asia ;
käräjäasia:käräjäasia n3_asia ;
työpaikka-asia:työpaikka-asia n3_asia ;
tuohirasia:tuohirasia n3_asia ;
enerkiahäviö:enerkia#häviö n3_ta ;
